Utah statutes.
11-13-305.   Impact alleviation requirements -- Payments in lieu of ad valorem tax -- Source of impact alleviation payment.

(1) (a) (i) A project entity may assume financial responsibility for or provide for the alleviation of the direct impacts of its project, and make loans to candidates to alleviate impacts created by the construction or operation of any facility owned by others which is utilized to furnish fuel, construction or operation materials for use in the project to the extent the impacts were attributable to the project.

(ii)  Provision for the alleviation may be made by contract as provided in Subsection (2) or by the terms of a determination order as provided in Section 11-13-306.

(b)  A Utah public agency that is not a project entity may take the actions set forth in this Subsection (1) as though it were a project entity with respect to its ownership interest in facilities providing additional project capacity.

(2) A candidate may, except as otherwise provided in Section 11-13-306, require the project entity or, in the case of facilities providing additional project capacity, any other public agency that owns an interest in those facilities, to enter into a contract with the candidate requiring the project entity or other public agency to assume financial responsibility for or provide for the alleviation of any direct impacts experienced by the candidate as a result of the project or facilities providing additional project capacity, as the case may be. Each contract with respect to a project or facilities providing additional project capacity shall be for a term ending at or before the end of the fiscal year of the candidate who is party to the contract immediately before the fiscal year in which the project becomes, or, in the case of facilities providing additional project capacity, those facilities become subject to the fee set forth in Section 11-13-302, unless terminated earlier as provided in Section 11-13-310, and shall specify the direct impacts or methods to determine the direct impacts to be covered, the amounts, or methods of computing the amounts, of the alleviation payments, or the means to provide for impact alleviation, provisions assuring the timely completion of the project or facilities providing additional project capacity and the furnishing of the services, and such other pertinent matters as shall be agreed to by the project entity or other public agency and the candidate.

(3) Beginning at the time specified in Subsection 11-13-302(1), the project entity or other public agency shall make in lieu ad valorem tax payments to that candidate to the extent required by, and in the manner provided in, Section 11-13-302.

(4)  Payments under any impact alleviation contract or pursuant to a determination by the board shall be made from the proceeds of bonds issued for the project or for the facilities providing additional project capacity or from any other sources of funds available with respect to the project or the facilities providing additional project capacity.

